src/esu.twol
"y:0 = te@y"
y:0 <=> t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* _ ; ! te@y/c
        t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* _ ; ! tey/c
        %(t%):c Bndry:* _ ; ! (t)y/c

"y:s = Stop@y" 
y:s <=> [VlessCon-t] (e:0) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! Stop@y/s
        [VlessCon-t] (e:0) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! Stopy/s
    except
        t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-AtSign:]* %@ʸ: [Bndry:-AtSign:]* _ ; ! te@y/c
        t:c (') e:0 (%°:) [Bndry:-%(u%):-AtSign:]* _ ; ! tey/c
        %(t%):c Bndry:* _ ; ! (t)y/c

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!     ALLOMORPHS    !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"(e):a = %/:" ! - bases kept with percent and dropped by colon
%(e%):a <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] r: (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! ar*e -> aa

"(e):e = VV[r/g]%e | e:0%e"
%(e%):e <=> :FVow :FVow [ r | g ] (%*:) %%:   %:: _ ;
                     e: [ r | g ] (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ ;
    except
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] r: (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! ar*e -> aa
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! age -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] i: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! ige/ir*e -> ii
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] u: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! uge/ur*e -> uu

"(e):i = age/ii"
%(e%):i <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] [a:|ạ:] g: (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! age -> ii
            [.#.|%=:|:Con] i: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! ige/ir*e -> ii

"(e):u = %/:" ! - bases kept with percent and dropped by colon
%(e%):u <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] u: [g:|r:] (%*:) %%:%> %:: _ [Con:] ; ! uge/ur*e -> uu

"(g):g = VVFinalBase"
%(g%):g <=> :Vow [:%>|:0]* :Vow [:%>|:0]* _ ;

"(g/t):g = VVFinalBase"
%(g%|t%):g <=> :Vow [:%>|:0]* :Vow [:%>|:0]* _ ;
    except
        :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase

"(g/t):t = CFinalBase"
%(g%|t%):t <=> :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase

"(ng):ng = VFinalBase"
%(ng%):ng <=> Vow: Bndry:* _ ;
    except
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] Vow: %:: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! CV:(ng)VC -> CVVC
        [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow %:: %~: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! CFV:~(ng)VC -> CVVC

"(ng):0 = :" ! - bases that get added then dropped after single vowel
%(ng%):0 <=> [.#.|%=:|:Con] Vow: %:: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! CV:(ng)VC -> CVVC
             [.#.|%=:|:Con] :FVow %:: %~: _ FVow: [Con:|Bndry:|%=:|.#.] ; ! CFV:~(ng)VC -> CVVC
             ! 

"(r):r = te Bases"
%(r%):r <=> :t :e %+: _ ; ! bases ending in te

"(s):s = VFinalBase"
%(s%):s <=> Vow: Bndry:* _ ; ! bases ending in a vowel

"(t):t = CFinalBase"
%(t%):t <=> :Con Bndry:* _ ; ! CFinalBase
    except
        :Con Bndry:* _ Bndry:* [s:|y:] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(t):c = (t)s/c"
%(t%):c <=> :Con Bndry:* _ Bndry:* [s:|y:] ; ! (t)[sy]/c

"(u):u = notFVow"
%(u%):u <=> [Con:|e:] Bndry:* _ ; ! notFVow = Con|e

"(u/i):i = te:(u/i)/ci"
%(u%|i%):i <=> t:c (') e: (%°:) %:: _ ; ! te:(u/i)/ci

"(u/i):u = [Con|e-te]:(u/i)/Cu"
%(u%|i%):u <=> \:FVow %:: _ ; ! [Con|e-te]:(u/i)/Cu
    except
        t:c (') e: (%°:) %:: _ ; ! te:(u/i)/ci

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!     OPERATOR      !!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! "Rule for Plus" - useless
! "Rule for Period" - useless

"%:0 = percentWeak" ! percent weak
%%:0 <=> [FVow|%=:] r: [Bndry:-%*:]* _ ;

"`:' = ApostropheRule"
%`:%' <=> .#. (Con) Vow Con e:0 [ Bndry: - %~: ]* _ ; ! "Rule for Apostrophe - short bases"
